Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2625
Child care grants; rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations setting forth criteria, application procedures, and methods to assure compliance with the criteria for grants to be awarded pursuant to section 43-2624.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 25;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 232;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 102.